Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4706
Effect on organizations operating without a certificate of authority.

Within one hundred eighty days after August 25, 1989, every prepaid limited health service organization operating in this state without a certificate of authority shall submit an application for a certificate of authority to the director. Each such organization may continue to operate during the pendency of its application. In the event an application is denied under this section, the applicant shall then be treated as a prepaid limited health service organization whose certificate of authority has been revoked.

Laws 1989, LB 320, § 6.